Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3,145
Health care coverage of children; insurer; prohibited acts.

An insurer shall not deny enrollment of a child under the health care coverage of the obligor on the ground that:

(1) The child was born out of wedlock;

(2) The child is not claimed as a dependent on the obligor's federal income tax return; or

(3) The child does not reside with the obligor or in the insurer's service area.

Laws 1994, LB 1224, § 73;

Laws 2002, LB 1062, § 7.